Nebraska, session 109, LB551.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB551 LB551
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 85-106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-106 (1) The Board of Regents shall have the power:
(a) (1) To enact laws for the government of the university;
(b) (2) To elect a president, vice presidents, chancellors, vice
chancellors, deans, associate deans, assistant deans, directors,
associate directors, assistant directors, professors, associate
professors, assistant professors, instructors, other members of the
faculty staff, and employees generally of the university and to provide
for academic tenure for professors, associate professors, and assistant
professors;
(c) (3) To prescribe the duties of such persons not inconsistent
with section 85-1,105;
(d) (4) To fix their compensation;
(e) (5) To provide, in its discretion, retirement benefits for
present and future employees of the university, subject to the following:
(i) (a) The cost of such retirement benefits shall be funded in
accordance with sound actuarial principles with the necessary
contributions for both past service and future service being treated in
the university budget in the same way as any other operating expense;
(ii) (b) The university contribution under any such retirement plan
shall be (A) (i) the rate established by the Board of Regents and not
more than eight percent of each university employee's full-time salary or
wage earnings for any calendar year before any agreement for reduction of
salary or wage earnings and (B) (ii) pursuant to an agreement for
reduction of salary or wage earnings, the amount of the reduction of
salary or wage earnings;
(iii) (c) Each employee's contribution shall be the rate established
by the Board of Regents and shall not be required to exceed the
university's contribution under subdivision (1)(e)(ii)(A) (5)(b)(i) of
this section, except that in lieu of making such contribution, each such
-2-

LB551 LB551
2025 2025
employee may enter into an agreement for reduction of salary or wages for
the purchase by the Board of Regents of annuity contracts for such
employee, under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, but the
amount of the reduction of salary or wages allowable under this
subdivision may not include credit for service prior to March 29, 1972;
(iv) (d) The retirement benefits of any employee for service prior
to September 1, 1961, shall be those provided under the retirement plan
then in force, which benefits shall not be abridged, except that such
retirement benefits shall become fully vested in the event of an
employee's termination of employment if such employee has at least ten
years of service at the date of termination;
(v) (e) Continued contributions to the system until the date of
retirement as provided in section 85-606; and
(vi) (f) The investment of retirement funds shall be pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act, but no change in the type of investment of such funds shall be made
without the prior approval of the Board of Regents;
(f) (6) To equalize and provide for uniform benefits for all present
and future employees, including group life insurance, group hospital-
medical insurance, group long-term disability income insurance, and
retirement benefits;
(g) (7) To provide, through the University Extension Division, for
the holding of classes at various localities throughout the state
avoiding unnecessary duplication of courses offered by other educational
institutions in such localities and consistent with the orders of the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education issued pursuant to
sections 85-1413 and 85-1414;
(h) (8) To remove the president, vice presidents, chancellors, vice
chancellors, deans, associate deans, assistant deans, directors,
associate directors, assistant directors, professors, associate
professors, assistant professors, instructors, other members of the
-3-

LB551 LB551
2025 2025
faculty staff, and employees generally, when the interests of the
university require it; and
(i) (9) To pay expenses for recruitment of academic, administrative,
professional, and managerial personnel.
(2) The Board of Regents shall not establish or authorize an
academic system of tenure for any employee of any institution governed by
the board who is not tenured prior to the effective date of this act. The
board shall adopt a written policy relating to:
(a) Employee agreements;
(b) Acceptable grounds for dismissal of faculty members, which shall
include, but not be limited to, just cause, program discontinuance, and
financial exigency;
(c) Annual performance evaluations of all faculty members;
(d) Minimum standards of good practice for faculty members;
(e) Standards for review and discipline of faculty members; and
(f) Procedures for dismissal for just cause, program discontinuance,
and financial exigency.
(3) The Board of Regents shall institute a continuing program of
preventive maintenance and a program of deferred maintenance consistent
with the provisions of the Deferred Building Renewal Act and shall
consult with the Nebraska Arts Council and acquire works of art for the
original construction of any public building under its supervision
consistent with sections 82-317 to 82-329 and 85-106.01 to 85-106.03.
Sec. 2. Section 85-304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-304 (1) The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges
shall have the power:
(a) To appoint a president and such other persons as may be required
for each state college;
(b) To fix their compensation and prescribe their duties;
(c) To remove all persons appointed, but the affirmative votes of
-4-

LB551 LB551
2025 2025
four members of the board shall be necessary to remove a president or an
assistant during the time for which such persons were appointed;
(d) Through an extension division, to provide for holding of classes
at various localities throughout the state, avoiding unnecessary
duplication of courses offered by other educational institutions in such
localities;
(e) To acquire real and personal property and dispose of the same
whenever any of the state colleges will be benefited thereby, but no
grounds upon which any buildings of any of the state colleges are located
shall be disposed of without the consent of the Legislature;
(f) To pay expenses for recruitment of academic, administrative,
professional, and managerial personnel; and
(g) To provide benefits for all present and future employees,
including group life insurance, group hospital-medical insurance, and
group long-term disability income insurance.
(2) The board shall have the duty:
(a) To institute a continuing program of preventive maintenance and
a program of deferred maintenance consistent with the provisions of the
Deferred Building Renewal Act; and
(b) To consult with the Nebraska Arts Council and acquire works of
art for the original construction of any public building under its
supervision consistent with sections 82-317 to 82-329 and 85-304 to
85-304.03.
(3) The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall not
establish or authorize an academic system of tenure for any employee of
any state college who is not tenured prior to the effective date of this
act. The board shall adopt a written policy relating to:
(a) Employee agreements;
(b) Acceptable grounds for dismissal of faculty members, which shall
include, but not be limited to, just cause, program discontinuance, and
financial exigency;
-5-

LB551 LB551
2025 2025
(c) Annual performance evaluations of all faculty members;
(d) Minimum standards of good practice for faculty members;
(e) Standards for review and discipline of faculty members; and
(f) Procedures for dismissal for just cause, program discontinuance,
and financial exigency.
Sec. 3. Section 85-1511, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1511 In addition to any other powers and duties imposed upon the
community college system or its areas, campuses, or boards by the
Community College Aid Act, sections 85-917 to 85-966 and 85-1501 to
85-1540, and any other provision of law, each board shall:
(1) Have general supervision, control, and operation of each
community college within its jurisdiction;
(2) Subject to coordination by the Coordinating Commission for
Postsecondary Education as prescribed in the Coordinating Commission for
Postsecondary Education Act, develop and offer programs of applied
technology education, academic transfer programs, academic support
courses, and such other programs and courses as the needs of the
community college area served may require. The board shall avoid
unnecessary duplication of existing programs and courses in meeting the
needs of the students and the community college area;
(3) Employ, for a period to be fixed by the board, executive
officers, members of the faculty, and such other administrative officers
and employees as may be necessary or appropriate and fix their salaries
and duties. A board shall not establish or authorize an academic system
of tenure for any employee of a community college who is not tenured
prior to the effective date of this act. The board shall adopt a written
policy relating to: ;
(a) Employee agreements;
(b) Acceptable grounds for dismissal of faculty members, which shall
include, but not be limited to, just cause, program discontinuance, and
-6-

LB551 LB551
2025 2025
financial exigency;
(c) Annual performance evaluations of all faculty members;
(d) Minimum standards of good practice for faculty members;
(e) Standards for review and discipline of faculty members; and
(f) Procedures for dismissal for just cause, program discontinuance,
and financial exigency;
(4) Subject to coordination by the Coordinating Commission for
Postsecondary Education as prescribed in the Coordinating Commission for
Postsecondary Education Act, construct, lease, purchase, purchase on
contract, operate, equip, and maintain facilities;
(5) Contract for services connected with the operation of the
community college area as needs and interest demand;
(6)(a) Cause a comprehensive audit of the books, accounts, records,
and affairs to be made annually covering the most recently completed
fiscal year. The audit of each area shall include all sources of revenue
used to finance operating expenditures and capital improvements and the
county-certified property valuation for the community college for the
fiscal year for which such audit is being performed. Such audit of the
books, accounts, records, and affairs shall be completed and filed with
the Auditor of Public Accounts, the commission, and the Department of
Administrative Services on or before November 15 of each year; and
(b) Cause a comprehensive audit of the full-time equivalent student
enrollment totals and reimbursable educational unit totals to be made
annually covering the most recently completed fiscal year. The audit of
each area shall include a report of full-time equivalent student
enrollment totals and reimbursable educational unit totals verified by
such audits for the three most recently completed fiscal years which
shall be used for calculation of aid to the community college areas for
fiscal year 2013-14 and each fiscal year thereafter pursuant to
subdivisions (3)(b) and (c) of section 85-2234. The audit of the full-
time equivalent student enrollment totals and reimbursable educational
-7-

LB551 LB551
2025 2025
unit totals shall be completed and filed with the Auditor of Public
Accounts, the commission, and the Department of Administrative Services
on or before August 15 of each year;
(7) Establish fees and charges for the facilities authorized by
sections 85-1501 to 85-1540. Such fees and charges shall be identified as
facility fees at the time they are assessed. The revenue from such fees
and charges, other than revenue pledged to retire bonds issued pursuant
to sections 85-1515 and 85-1520 to 85-1527 and deposited in a separate
bond sinking fund, shall be deposited in the capital improvement and bond
sinking fund provided for in section 85-1515. Each board may enter into
agreements with owners of facilities to be used for housing regarding the
management, operation, and government of such facilities and may employ
necessary employees to govern, manage, and operate such facilities;
(8) Receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, and bequests of real
and personal property from public or private sources as may be made from
time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions
thereof will aid in carrying out the community college programs as
specified by law. Each board may sell, lease, exchange, invest, or expend
such gifts, grants, conveyances, and bequests or the proceeds, rents,
profits, and income therefrom according to the terms and conditions
thereof and adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the
receipt and expenditure of such proceeds, rents, profits, and income,
except that acceptance of such gifts, grants, or conveyances shall not be
conditioned on matching state or local funds;
(9) Prescribe the courses of study for any community college under
its control and publish such catalogs and bulletins as may be necessary;
(10) Grant to every student upon graduation or completion of a
course of study a suitable diploma, associate degree, or certificate;
(11) Adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations and perform all
other acts as the board may deem necessary or appropriate to the
administration of the community college area. Such rules and regulations
-8-

LB551 LB551
2025 2025
shall include, but not be limited to, rules and regulations relating to
facilities, housing, scholarships, discipline, and pedestrian and
vehicular traffic on property owned, operated, or maintained by the
community college area;
(12) Employ, for a period to be fixed by the board, an executive
officer for the community college area and, by written order filed in its
office, delegate to such executive officer any of the powers and duties
vested in or imposed upon it by sections 85-1501 to 85-1540. Such
delegated powers and duties may be exercised in the name of the board;
(13) Acquire real property by eminent domain pursuant to sections
76-701 to 76-724;
(14) Acquire real and personal property and sell, convey, or lease
such property whenever the community college area will be benefited
thereby. The sale, conveyance, or lease of any real estate owned by a
community college area shall be effective only when authorized by an
affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of all the members of the board;
(15) Enter into agreements for services, facilities, or equipment
and for the presentation of courses for students when such agreements are
deemed to be in the best interests of the education of the students
involved;
(16) Transfer tribally controlled community college state aid
amounts to a tribally controlled community college located within its
community college area;
(17) Invest, after proper consideration of the requirements for the
availability of money, funds of the community college in securities the
nature of which individuals of prudence, discretion, and intelligence
acquire or retain in dealing with the property of another;
(18) Establish tuition rates for courses of instruction offered by
each community college within its community college area. Separate
tuition rates shall be established for students who are nonresidents of
the State of Nebraska. Each board may also establish fees to support the
-9-

LB551 LB551
2025 2025
operating expenditures of the community college area if such fees are
accounted for separately from the fees and charges established for
facilities pursuant to subdivision (7) of this section and are identified
as operating fees at the time they are assessed;
(19) Establish a fiscal year for the community college area which
conforms to the fiscal year of the state;
(20) Enter into a memorandum of understanding with the State Board
of Education to adopt a policy to share student data. At a minimum, the
policy shall ensure that the exchange of information is conducted in
conformance with the requirements of the federal Family Educational
Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, as amended, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, and all
federal regulations and applicable guidelines adopted in accordance with
such act, as such act, regulations, and guidelines existed on January 1,
2010; and
(21) Exercise any other powers, duties, and responsibilities
necessary to carry out sections 85-1501 to 85-1540.
Sec. 4. Section 85-1530, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1530 Each board shall adopt a reduction-in-force policy covering
employees subject to such statutory provisions to carry out the intent of
sections 85-1530 to 85-1533. No such policy shall allow the reduction of
a permanent or tenured employee while a probationary employee is retained
to render a service which such permanent employee is qualified by reason
of certification and endorsement to perform or, if certification is not
applicable, by reason of college credits in the teaching area. If
employee evaluation is to be included as a criterion to be used for
reduction in force, specific criteria, such as frequency of evaluation,
evaluation forms, and number and length of classroom observations shall
be included as part of the reduction-in-force policy.
Sec. 5. Original sections 85-106, 85-304, 85-1511, and 85-1530,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-10-